Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1805
Snow fences; access to adjacent property authorized; damages; payment.

The county board shall cause the county roads to be kept sufficiently clear of snow and ice so as to be reasonably safe for travel. The county shall have the authority to enter upon private or public property adjacent to any county road and to place and maintain thereon snow fences wherever it is deemed necessary in order to prevent snow drifting on the traveled portion of such road. Such snow fences shall be erected in such a manner as to provide the most protection to the road and shall not be placed on such property prior to October 15, nor remain on such property after April 1, without the consent of the property owner. In case of any damage to such property, the county shall pay the amount of such damage to the owner of the property.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. V, § 5, p. 553.